Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.150

Action for fines or forfeitures.

Fines and forfeitures may be recovered by an action at law in the name of the officer or person to whom they are by law given, or in the name of the officer or person who by law is authorized to prosecute for them.

[Code 1881 s 657; 1869 p 153 s 597; RRS s 963.]

NOTES:

Limitation of actions: Chapter 4.16 RCW.